District of Columbia statutes.
8-109.03

Environmental Impact Statement requirements.

(a)

Whenever the Mayor or a board, commission, authority, or person proposes or approves a major action that is likely to have substantial negative impact on the environment, if implemented, the Mayor, board, commission, authority, or person shall prepare or cause to be prepared, and transmit, in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, a detailed EIS at least 60 days prior to implementation of the proposed major action, unless the Mayor determines that the proposed major action has been or is subject to the functional equivalent of an EIS. The EIS shall be written in a concise manner. The EIS shall describe and, where appropriate, analyze:

(1)

The goals and nature of the proposed major action and its environment;

(2)

The relationship of the proposed major action to the goals of the adopted Comprehensive Plan, requirements as promulgated by the Zoning Commission, and any District or federal environmental standards;

(3)

Any adverse environmental impact that cannot be avoided if the proposed major action is implemented;

(4)

Alternatives to the proposed major action, including alternative locations and the adverse and beneficial effects of the alternatives;

(5)

Any irreversible and irretrievable commitment of resources involved in the implementation of the proposed major action;

(6)

Mitigation measures proposed to minimize any adverse environmental impact;

(7)

The impact of the proposed major action on the use and conservation of energy resources, if applicable and significant;

(8)

The cumulative impact of the major action when considered in conjunction with other proposed actions;

(9)

The environmental effect of future expansion or action, if expansion or action is a reasonably foreseeable consequence of the initial major action and the future expansion or action will likely change the scope or nature of the initial major action or its environmental effects;

(10)

Responses to comments provided by the Council, any affected Advisory Neighborhood Commission, and interested members of the public; and

(11)

Any additional information that the Mayor or a board, commission, or authority determines to be helpful in assessing the environmental impact of any proposed major action and the suggested alternatives.

(b)

The Mayor, board, commission, or authority shall transmit a copy of any EIS prepared pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to the Council, any District agency that has responsibility for implementing the major action or special expertise with respect to any environmental impact involved, and any affected Advisory Neighborhood Commission. A copy of the EIS shall be made available for review by the public in the main office of the agency primarily responsible for implementing or permitting the proposed major action. The Mayor, board, commission, or authority shall provide a reasonable period consistent with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, for comment on any EIS required to be prepared pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. If 25 registered voters in an affected single member district request a public hearing on an EIS or supplemental EIS or there is significant public interest, the Mayor, board, commission, or authority shall conduct a public hearing pursuant to the rules issued in accordance with § 8-109.09(a).

(c)

(1)

The Mayor, board, agency, commission, or authority of the District government shall determine within 30 days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, of receipt of an application for a proposed major action whether an EIS is required, if the action involves the grant or issuance of a lease, permit, license, certificate, or other entitlement by a District agency.

(2)

If the Mayor, or a board, commission, or authority of the District government determines that an EIS is not required for a major action that is likely to involve the creation, use, transportation, storage, or disposal of a hazardous substance, the Mayor shall prepare, make available for public inspection, and transmit to the Council a written determination that describes why an EIS is not required prior to the grant or issuance of any applicable lease, permit, license, certificate, entitlement, or permission to act.

(3)

If the major action involves the grant or issuance to an applicant of a lease, permit, license, certificate, or other entitlement by a District agency:

(A)

The agency shall notify the applicant, in writing, if a determination has been made that an EIS is required. Notice of the determination and the findings that support the determination shall be kept on file by the Mayor.

(B)

The Mayor, board, commission, or authority may require an applicant to prepare an EIS. A nongovernmental applicant shall be charged a fee to cover the cost of agency review of the EIS. No lease, permit, license, certificate, or other entitlement shall be issued, unless the applicant required to prepare an EIS has completed the EIS in compliance with this subchapter and paid any fee charged pursuant to this paragraph.

(C)

The applicant shall assist the Mayor, or the board, commission, or authority at any stage of the review of the proposed major action by timely submitting all relevant information concerning impact, costs, benefits, and alternatives. The Mayor, board, commission, or authority shall deny a proposed action, if the applicant fails to submit relevant information as specified in rules promulgated pursuant to § 8-109.09.

History

Oct. 18, 1989, D.C. Law 8-36, § 4, 36 DCR 5741

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-109.05.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-983.